Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 4 Public School Employees Retirement System

Cross references.

Health insurance plans for retired public school employees, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. VI.

Authorization for creation of retirement system for employees of public schools, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. III.

Health care plans for public school employees, §

20-2-910

et seq.

Reimbursement of Department of Law by Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia, Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, for legal services, § 45-15-37.